Tennessee, session 114, HB0874.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Tennessee Protection of
Children Against Sexual Exploitation Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 10, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A provider of electronic communications service, as defined in § 39-17-308, is
prohibited from notifying an account holder, or any other person not authorized to be
notified, of the service or the content of a search warrant or subpoena issued to the
electronic communications service provider if the search warrant or subpoena was
issued in relation to an investigation of the commission of an offense under this part.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0874
001759
- 1 -